apertium-hun.hun.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AÁBCDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNOÓÖŐPQRSTUÚÜŰVWXYZaábcdeéfghiíjklmnoóöőpqrstuúüűvwxyz</alphabet>
 
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"              c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"          c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"          c="Verb 'or not to be'"/>
    <sdef n="np"             c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"            c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"            c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="post"           c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="det"            c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="prn"            c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ij"             c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"         c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"         c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="num"            c="numeral"/>

    <sdef n="mod"            c="modal stuff"/>

    <sdef n="f"              c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"              c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"             c="Masculine / feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sg"             c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"             c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="p1"             c="1. person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"             c="2. person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"             c="3. person"/>

    <sdef n="px1ss"          c="1. person singular possessive (singular)"/>
    <sdef n="px2ss"          c="2. person singular possessive (singular)"/>
    <sdef n="px3ss"          c="3. person singular possessive (singular)"/>
    <sdef n="px1sp"          c="1. person singular possessive (plural)"/>
    <sdef n="px2sp"          c="2. person singular possessive (plural)"/>
    <sdef n="px3sp"          c="3. person singular possessive (plural)"/>
    <sdef n="px1ps"          c="1. person plural possessive (singular)"/>
    <sdef n="px2ps"          c="2. person plural possessive (singular)"/>
    <sdef n="px3ps"          c="3. person plural possessive (singular)"/>
    <sdef n="px1pp"          c="1. person plural possessive (plural)"/>
    <sdef n="px2pp"          c="2. person plural possessive (plural)"/>
    <sdef n="px3pp"          c="3. person plural possessive (plural)"/>

    <sdef n="inf"            c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp"             c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pri"           c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="past"           c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pot"            c="Potential form"/>
    <sdef n="subj"           c="Sub jontif"/>

    <sdef n="qst"            c="question"/>

    <sdef n="ant"            c="Anthroponym"/>

    <sdef n="itg"            c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="ind"            c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pers"           c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="def"            c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"            c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"            c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"            c="Dative"/>
    
    <sdef n="ine"            c="Inessive"/>
    <sdef n="ill"            c="Illative"/>
    <sdef n="all"            c="Allative"/>
    <sdef n="ses"            c="Superessive"/>
    <sdef n="ade"            c="Adessive"/>
    <sdef n="sub"           c="Sublative"/>
    <sdef n="ela"            c="Elative"/>
    <sdef n="dela"           c="Delative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"            c="Ablative"/>

    <sdef n="ins"            c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="com"            c="Comitative"/>
    <sdef n="cau"            c="Causal"/>
    <sdef n="fin"            c="Final"/>
    <sdef n="tra"           c="Translative"/>
    <sdef n="term"           c="Terminative"/>
    <sdef n="ess1"         c="Essive-formal"/>
    <sdef n="ess2"         c="Essive-modal"/>
    
    <sdef n="comp"           c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"            c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="foo"            c="I dunno but I had to add some tag"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="és__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="előtt__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="/a__det">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>az</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="egy__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="/én__prn">
      <e><p><l>én</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>engem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőlem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nálam</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzám</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nekem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>velem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>értem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rólam</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőlem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belém</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bennem</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajtam</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rám</l><r>én<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/te__prn">
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>téged</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőled</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nálad</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzád</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>neked</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veled</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>érted</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rólad</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőled</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>beléd</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>benned</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajtad</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rád</l><r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="és"><i>és</i><par n="és__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="és__cnjcoo"/></e>
  <e lm="addig"><i>addig</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="akár"><i>akár</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="ámbár"><i>ámbár</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="amennyiben"><i>amennyiben</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="amíg"><i>amíg</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="amint"><i>amint</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="amúgyis"><i>amúgyis</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="annálinkább"><i>annálinkább</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="azazhogy"><i>azazhogy</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="azonban"><i>azonban</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="aztán"><i>aztán</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="bárcsak"><i>bárcsak</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="bezzeg"><i>bezzeg</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="dehogyis"><i>dehogyis</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="egyébiránt"><i>egyébiránt</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="egyrészt"><i>egyrészt</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="ellenben"><i>ellenben</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="elsősorban"><i>elsősorban</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="emellett"><i>emellett</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="éspedig"><i>éspedig</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="ezenkívül"><i>ezenkívül</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="ezesetben"><i>ezesetben</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="hacsak"><i>hacsak</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="hagyján"><i>hagyján</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="hanem"><i>hanem</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="hiszen"><i>hiszen</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="hogy"><i>hogy</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="hovatovább"><i>hovatovább</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="illetőleg"><i>illetőleg</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="jelesen"><i>jelesen</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="kvázi"><i>kvázi</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="legalábbis"><i>legalábbis</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="magyarul"><i>magyarul</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="másfelől"><i>másfelől</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="másrészt"><i>másrészt</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mégiscsak"><i>mégiscsak</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mennél"><i>mennél</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="miáltal"><i>miáltal</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mígnem"><i>mígnem</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mikor"><i>mikor</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mindamellett"><i>mindamellett</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mindenekelőtt"><i>mindenekelőtt</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="minekelőtte"><i>minekelőtte</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mintha"><i>mintha</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="mintsem"><i>mintsem</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="miután"><i>miután</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="namármost"><i>namármost</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="nemde"><i>nemde</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="nohát"><i>nohát</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="pediglen"><i>pediglen</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="ráadásul"><i>ráadásul</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="semmint"><i>semmint</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="stb"><i>stb</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="természetszerűleg"><i>természetszerűleg</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="tulajdonképp"><i>tulajdonképp</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="ugyanis"><i>ugyanis</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="úgyhogy"><i>úgyhogy</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="úgyse"><i>úgyse</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="utóvégre"><i>utóvégre</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="vajh"><i>vajh</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="végtéreis"><i>végtéreis</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
  <e lm="viszont"><i>viszont</i><par n="ha__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="előtt"><i>előtt</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="elől"><i>elől</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="alá"><i>alá</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="alám"><i>alám</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="mögött"><i>mögött</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="mögül"><i>mögül</i><par n="előtt__post"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i></i><par n="/a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="egy"><i>egy</i><par n="egy__det"/></e>
    <e lm="én"><i></i><par n="/én__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="te"><i></i><par n="/te__prn"/></e>
